Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-1756
Purchase of personal property without bidding; when.

(1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law or a home rule charter, a city or village which has established, by an interlocal agreement with any county, a joint purchasing division or agency may purchase personal property without competitive bidding if the price for the property has been established by the federal General Services Administration or the materiel division of the Department of Administrative Services.

(2) For purposes of this section:

(a) Personal property includes, but is not limited to, supplies, materials, and equipment used by or furnished to any officer, office, department, institution, board, or other agency; and

(b) Purchasing or purchase means the obtaining of personal property by sale, lease, or other contractual means.

Laws 1997, LB 315, § 1.